North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 6. Judicial Relief.

§ 55A-1-60.
Judicial relief.

If for any reason it is impracticable for any corporation to call or conduct a meeting of its members, delegates, or directors, or otherwise obtain their consent, in the manner prescribed by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, or this Chapter, then upon petition of a director, officer, delegate, member, or the Attorney General, the superior court may order that such a meeting be held or that a written ballot or other method be used for obtaining the vote of members, delegates, or directors, in such a manner as the court finds fair and equitable under the circumstances.

The court shall, in an order issued pursuant to this section, provide for a method of notice reasonably designed to give actual notice to all such persons who would be entitled to notice of a meeting held pursuant to the articles of incorporation, bylaws, and this Chapter, and notice given in this manner shall be effective whether or not it results in actual notice to all such persons or conforms to the notice requirements that would otherwise apply. Notice shall be given in this manner to all persons determined by the court to be members or directors.

The order issued pursuant to this section may, to the extent the court finds it reasonably required under the circumstances, dispense with any requirement relating to the holding of or voting at meetings or obtaining votes, including any requirement as to quorums or as to the number or percentage of votes needed for approval, that would otherwise be imposed by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or this Chapter.

Whenever practical any order issued pursuant to this section shall limit the subject matter of meetings or other forms of consent authorized to items, including amendments to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the resolution of which will or may enable the corporation to continue managing its affairs without further resort to this section; provided, however, that an order under this section may also authorize the obtaining of whatever votes and approvals are necessary for the dissolution, merger, or sale of assets.

Any meeting or other method of obtaining the vote of members, delegates, or directors conducted pursuant to an order issued under this section, and that complies with all the provisions of the order, is for all purposes a valid meeting or vote, as the case may be, and shall have the same force and effect as if it complied with every requirement imposed by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, and this Chapter.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law and is adapted from the Model Act. It authorizes the superior court, in its discretion, to prescribe special procedures that will enable a corporation to call and conduct meetings or obtain the consent of members, delegates or directors when it is otherwise impracticable to do so. This section permits judicial relief only if the procedures established in the corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws or prescribed by statute are not viable under the circumstances and any relief granted should be limited in scope to that necessary to remove the impediment which makes compliance with such procedures impracticable, regardless of whether the impediment prevents a continuation of the corporation’s activities or consideration of dissolution, merger or a sale of the corporation’s assets.